Wyoming, session 2026, HB0074.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xliv) is amended to read:

21-3-110. Duties of boards of trustees.

(a) The board of trustees in each school district
shall:

HB0074

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0389
(xliv) Ensure that each school district in the
state requires every multiple occupancy restroom, changing
room or sleeping quarters be designated for the exclusive
use of the male sex or the exclusive use of the female sex.
Effective school year 2026-2027 and each school year
thereafter, the board of trustees shall ensure that an
adequate supply of feminine hygiene products are available
free of charge in each restroom that is designated for the
exclusive use of the female sex and that is regularly used
by students. The board of trustees shall inform public
school students of the availability and location of
feminine hygiene products under this paragraph. As used in
this paragraph, "feminine hygiene products" means tampons,
sanitary napkins or other similar products designed for
hygiene in connection with the human menstrual cycle.

Section 2.

(a) There is appropriated four hundred eighty seven
thousand five hundred dollars ($487,500.00) from the public
school foundation program account to the department of
education-school finance to provide funding to school
districts to provide feminine hygiene products as required
HB0074

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0389
by section 1 of this act for school years 2026-2027 and
2027-2028. School districts shall be reimbursed based on
actual costs to provide feminine hygiene products and
dispensers that are submitted to the department of
education-school finance, subject to the following
limitations:

(i) For school year 2026-2027, no school
district shall be reimbursed more than one thousand one
hundred dollars ($1,100.00) for every one hundred female
students in grades six (6) through twelve (12) for the
costs of providing feminine hygiene product dispensers and
supplies;

(ii) For school year 2027-2028, no school
district shall be reimbursed more than eight hundred fifty
dollars ($850.00) for every one hundred female students in
grades six (6) through twelve (12) for the costs of
providing feminine hygiene product supplies.

(b) The appropriation under subsection (a) of this
section shall be for the period beginning with the
effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2028. This
HB0074

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0389
appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any
other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds
remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided
by law on June 30, 2028. It is the intent of the
legislature that the appropriation in this section be
included in the standard budget of the department of
education-school finance for the immediately succeeding
fiscal biennium.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0074